California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Notwithstanding Section 11341, a temporary license may be issued pending the outcome of the fingerprint and background check or as otherwise prescribed by the director. A temporary license is valid for up to 150 days. Unless otherwise prohibited pursuant to Section 17520 of the Family Code, a temporary license may be renewed once at the discretion of the director.

(b) The director may issue a probationary license as follows:

(1) By term.

(2) By conditions to be observed in the exercise of the privileges granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 21.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.

The director shall adopt regulations governing the process and procedure of applying for registration as an appraisal management company. Applications for a certificate of registration shall require, at a minimum, all of the following:

(a) The name of the person or entity seeking registration.

(b) The business address and telephone number of the person or entity seeking registration.

(c) If the applicant is not a person or entity domiciled in this state, the name and contact number of a person or entity acting as agent for service of process in this state, along with an irrevocable consent
 to service of process in favor of the bureau.

(d) The name, address, and contact information for each controlling person of the applicant who has operational authority to direct the management of, and establish policies for, the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 48.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.05.

(a) A registrant shall notify the bureau within 10 business days, on a form developed by the bureau, of any additions, deletions, or changes in the names, addresses, and contact information for the individuals listed on its application.

(b) A registrant shall correct information on file with the
 bureau within 10 business days of discovering an error in that information, and shall not be subject to disciplinary action by the director or the bureau for incorrect information the registrant corrects within 10 business days of its discovery as being inaccurate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 49.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.1.

A certificate of registration as an appraisal management company shall be valid for a period of two years, unless otherwise extended or limited by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 173, Sec. 11.   (SB 237)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.2.

(a) An individual shall not act as a controlling person for a registrant if any of the following apply:

(1) The individual has entered a plea of guilty or no contest to, or been convicted of, a felony. If the individual’s felony conviction has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, or 1203.425 of the Penal Code, the bureau may allow the individual to act as a controlling person.

(2) The individual has had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser or to engage in activities related to the transfer of real property refused, denied, canceled, or revoked in this state or any other
 state.

(b) Any individual who acts as a controlling person of an appraisal management company and who enters a plea of guilty or no contest to, or is convicted of, a felony, or who has a license or certificate as an appraiser refused, denied, canceled, or revoked in any other state shall report that fact or cause that fact to be reported to the bureau, in writing, within 10 days of the date the individual has knowledge of that fact.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 50.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.3.

All appraisal management companies shall do all of the following:

(a) Ensure that all contracted appraisal panel members possess all required licenses and certificates from the bureau.

(b) Establish and comply with processes and controls reasonably designed to ensure that the appraisal management company, in engaging an appraiser, selects an appraiser who is independent of the transaction and who has the requisite license, education, expertise, and experience necessary to competently complete the appraisal assignment for the particular market and property type.

(c) Direct the
 appraiser to perform the assignment in accordance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

(d) Establish and comply with processes and controls reasonably designed to ensure that the appraisal management company conducts its appraisal management services in accordance with the requirements of Section 129E(a) through (i) of the Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. 1639e(a) through (i), and regulations thereunder.

(e) Engage appraisal panel members with an engagement letter that shall include terms of payment.

(f) Appraisal management companies shall maintain all of the following records for each service request:

(1) Date of receipt of the
 request.

(2) Name of the person from whom the request was received.

(3) Name of the client for whom the request was made, if different from the name of the person from whom the request was received.

(4) The appraiser or appraisers assigned to perform the requested service.

(5) Date of delivery of the appraisal product to the client.

(6) Client contract.

(7) Engagement letter.

(8) The appraisal report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 51.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.4.

No person or entity acting in the capacity of an appraisal management company shall improperly influence or attempt to improperly influence the development, reporting, result, or review of any appraisal through coercion, extortion, inducement, collusion, bribery, intimidation, compensation, or instruction. Prohibited acts include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Seeking to influence an appraiser to report a minimum or maximum value for the property being valued. Such influence may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Requesting that an appraiser provide a preliminary estimate or opinion of value for one or more properties prior to entering into a contract
 with that appraiser for appraisal services related to that property or properties.

(2) Conditioning whether to hire an appraiser based on an expectation of the value conclusion likely to be returned by that appraiser.

(3) Conditioning the amount of an appraiser’s compensation on the value conclusion returned by that appraiser.

(4) Providing an appraiser with an anticipated, estimated, encouraged, or desired valuation prior to their completion of an appraisal. 

(b) Withholding or threatening to withhold timely payment to an appraiser because the person does not return a value at or above a certain amount.

(c) Implying to an appraiser that current or future retention of that appraiser
 depends on the amount at which the appraiser estimates the value of real property.

(d) Excluding an appraiser who prepares an appraisal from consideration for future engagement because the appraiser reports a value that does not meet or exceed a predetermined threshold.

(e) Conditioning the compensation paid to an appraiser on consummation of the real estate transaction for which the appraisal is prepared.

(f) Requesting the payment of compensation from an appraiser for purposes of enabling that appraiser to achieve higher priority in the assignment of appraisal business.

(g) Nothing in this section prohibits a person or entity acting in the capacity of an appraisal management company from doing any of the following:

(1) Asking an appraiser to do any of the following:

(A) Consider additional, appropriate property information, including information about comparable properties.

(B) Provide further detail, substantiation, or explanation for the appraiser’s value conclusion.

(C) Correct errors in an appraisal report.

(2) Obtaining multiple valuations, for purposes of selecting the most reliable valuation.

(3) Withholding compensation due to breach of contract or substandard performance of services.

(4) Providing a copy of the sales contract in connection with a purchase
 transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 716, Sec. 3.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.45.

A person or entity may not structure an appraisal assignment for, or a contract with, an employee appraiser or an independent contractor appraiser for the purpose of evading the provisions of this part relating to appraisal management companies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 683, Sec. 6.   (AB 2519)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.5.

For purposes of subdivision (d) of Section 11302 and determining whether, within a 12-month period, an appraisal management company oversees an appraiser panel of more than 15 state-certified or state-licensed appraisers in a state or 25 or more state-certified or state-licensed appraisers in two or more states:

(a) An appraiser is deemed part of the appraisal management company’s appraiser panel as of the earliest date on which the appraisal management company does either of the following:

(1) Accepts the appraiser for the appraisal management company’s consideration for future appraisal assignments in covered
 transactions or for secondary mortgage market participants in connection with covered transactions.

(2) Engages the appraiser to perform one or more appraisals on behalf of a creditor for a covered transaction or secondary mortgage market participant in connection with covered transactions.

(b) An appraiser who is deemed part of the appraisal management company’s appraiser panel pursuant to subdivision (a) is deemed to remain on the panel until the date on which the appraisal management company does either of the following:

(1) Sends written notice to the appraiser removing the appraiser from the appraiser panel, with an explanation of its action.

(2) Receives
 written notice from the appraiser asking to be removed from the appraiser panel or notice of the death or incapacity of the appraiser.

(c) If an appraiser is removed from an appraisal management company’s appraiser panel pursuant to subdivision (b), but the appraisal management company subsequently accepts the appraiser for consideration for future assignments or engages the appraiser at any time during the 12 months after the appraisal management company’s removal, the removal will be deemed not to have occurred, and the appraiser will be deemed to have been part of the appraisal management company’s appraiser panel without interruption.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 69.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.6.

(a) No appraisal management company may alter, modify, or otherwise change a completed appraisal report submitted by an appraiser.

(b) No appraisal management company may require an appraiser to provide it with the appraiser’s digital signature or seal. However, nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to prohibit an appraiser from voluntarily providing his or her digital signature or seal to another person, to the extent permissible under the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 70.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.7.

No person or entity preparing an appraisal or performing appraisal management functions in connection with the origination, modification, or refinancing of a mortgage loan shall have a prohibited direct or indirect interest, financial or otherwise, in the property or the transaction for which the appraisal or appraisal management functions are performed, within the meaning of Section 226.42(d) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the accompanying commentary contained in Volume 75 of the Federal Register, page 66554, dated October 28, 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 716, Sec. 4.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.8.

A federally regulated appraisal management company operating in California shall report to the bureau the information the bureau is required to submit to the Appraisal Subcommittee, pursuant to the Appraisal Subcommittee’s policies regarding the determination of the Appraisal Management Company Registry fee. The bureau may charge the federally regulated appraisal management company a state fee in an amount not to exceed the reasonable regulatory cost to the board for processing and submitting the information. This fee shall be deposited in the Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 71.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11346.

The provisions of this part relating to appraisal management companies shall cease to be operative 60 days after the effective date of a federal law that mandates the registration or licensing of appraisal management companies with an entity other than the state regulatory authority with jurisdiction over licensed and certified appraisers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 173, Sec. 17.   (SB 237)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11347.

(a) The bureau may request that a licensee identify their race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender, or gender identity. The data may be requested when an initial license is issued or at the time of license renewal.

(b) The bureau shall maintain the confidentiality of the information it receives from a licensee under this section and shall only release the information in an aggregate form that cannot be used to identify an individual.

(c) A licensee shall not be required to provide the information specified in subdivision (a) as a condition of licensure or license renewal, and a licensee shall not be subject to
 discipline for not providing the information specified in subdivision (a).

(d) The bureau may publish the aggregate demographic data that it collects pursuant to this section on its internet website.

(e) Beginning January 1, 2025, the bureau shall submit the aggregate demographic data that it collects pursuant to this section to the department. The department shall post the information provided by the bureau on the department’s website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 200, Sec. 2.   (AB 342)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Reciprocity of Licenses and Certification [11350. - 11352.]

11350.

The director shall adopt regulations governing the process and procedure of applying for reciprocity, which shall meet, at a minimum, the requirements of the Appraisal Subcommittee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 837, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11351.

Temporary practice is not required under this chapter if the appraiser from another state assists in the performance of the appraisal as provided by Section 11324.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 940, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11352.

The director shall adopt regulations governing the process and procedure of applying for temporary practice, which shall meet, at a minimum, the requirements of the Appraisal Subcommittee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 837, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Continuing Education [11360. - 11361.]

11360.

(a) The director shall adopt regulations governing the process and procedures for renewal of a license or restoration of a license to active status that shall include, but not be limited to, continuing education requirements, which shall be reported on the basis of a four-year continuing education cycle, and, for each licensee renewing on or after January 1, 2023, include at least two hours of elimination of bias training, either individually or as part of a broader course.

(b) An applicant for renewal of a license shall be required to demonstrate the applicant’s continuing fitness to hold a license prior to its renewal. Applicants shall also fulfill continuing education requirements
 established pursuant to this section and shall be required to take a minimum of four hours of federal and California appraisal related statutory and regulatory law every four years.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2023, as part of the continuing education required by this section, a licensee shall complete at least one hour of instruction in cultural competency every four years.

(d) The cost of any educational course required by this section shall not be borne by any client served by a licensee.

(e) For purposes of this section, “cultural competency” means understanding and applying cultural and ethnic data to the process of providing services that includes, but is not limited to, information on the appropriate services
 for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and intersex communities, ethnic communities, and religious communities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 70.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11361.

The director shall adopt regulations for implementation of this chapter to ensure that persons engaged in appraisal activity have current knowledge of real estate appraisal theories, practices, and techniques which will provide a high degree of service and protection to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 491, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Fees [11400. - 11409.]

11400.

(a) Initial application fees shall be paid to the bureau at the time of application.

(b) All fees shall be paid by cashier’s check, certified check, or money order. In addition, the bureau may accept personal checks or credit cards for the payment of fees. All fees shall be deemed earned by the bureau upon receipt and are refundable at the discretion of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 52.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.

(a) The fee to take an examination or reexamination for a license shall be set at an amount not to exceed the cost to the bureau as determined by competitive bid.

(b) The director may provide that the applicant pay the fee directly to the examination provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 53.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.

The fee for an original or renewal real estate appraiser license or appraiser trainee license shall not exceed four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 683, Sec. 9.   (AB 2519)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11405.

The fee for an original or renewal certification as a state certified real estate appraiser shall not exceed five hundred twenty-five dollars ($525).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 683, Sec. 10.   (AB 2519)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11406.

(a) The director shall by regulation establish fees for approval of basic education and continuing education courses or their equivalent, or for the evaluation of petitions of applicants based upon claims of equivalency pursuant to Section 11340. The fees established by regulation shall be sufficient to cover the costs incurred by the bureau in processing applications for course approvals and petitions for equivalency.

(b) The director shall by regulation establish fees for approval of courses of study required to be taken by applicants for licenses. The fees established by regulation shall be sufficient to cover the costs incurred by the bureau in
 processing applications for course approvals and petitions for equivalency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 54.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11406.5.

The director shall, by regulation, establish the fees to be imposed on appraisal management companies. The fees shall be sufficient to cover the costs incurred by the bureau in administering the changes to this part made by the act adding this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 55.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11407.

The director may by regulation prescribe fees lower than the maximum fees established by this chapter if the director determines that lower fees will be adequate to offset the costs incurred by the bureau and the committee in the administration of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 56.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11408.

(a) An applicant for licensure shall not be eligible to have a license issued unless the applicant notifies the bureau within one year of successful completion of the examination.

(b) Every applicant or licensee shall pay federal registry fees and state registry processing fees to the state as required as part of licensing fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 57.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11409.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any order issued in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding may direct a licensee, applicant for licensure, person who acts in a capacity that requires a license under this part, registrant, applicant for a certificate of registration, course provider, applicant for course provider accreditation, or a person who, or entity that, acts in a capacity that requires course provider accreditation found to have committed a violation or violations of statutes or regulations relating to real estate appraiser practice to pay a sum not to exceed the reasonable costs of investigation, enforcement, and prosecution of the case.

(b) When an order for
 recovery of costs is made and payment is not made within 30 days of the date directed in the bureau’s decision, the order for recovery shall constitute a valid and enforceable civil judgment. This judgment shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other criminal or civil penalties provided for by law.

(c) (1) Failure of a licensee, applicant for licensure, person who acts in a capacity that requires a license under this part, registrant, applicant for a certificate of registration, course provider, applicant for course provider accreditation, or a person who, or entity that, acts in a capacity that requires course provider accreditation to pay recovery costs or make a recovery cost payment within 30 days of the date ordered, shall result in disciplinary action by the bureau. If the person fails to pay recovery
 costs within 30 days, that person shall pay interest and a penalty of 10 percent of the recovery costs or payment amount. Interest shall be charged at the pooled money investment rate.

(2) If recovery costs are not paid as ordered, the full amount of the assessed fine shall be added to any fee for renewal of a license or a certificate of registration. A license or a certificate of registration shall not be renewed prior to payment of the renewal fee and recovery costs.

(3) The director may order the full amount of any recovery costs to be immediately due and payable if any payment on the recovery costs, or portion thereof, is not received within 30 days of its due date.

(4) Any recovery costs, or interest thereon,
 not paid within 30 days of a final order shall constitute a valid and enforceable civil judgment.

(d) A certified copy of the bureau’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order and its terms.

(e) The bureau shall not renew or reinstate the license of any licensee or the certificate of registration of any registrant who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(f) Nothing in this section shall preclude the bureau from including the recovery of the costs of investigation and enforcement of a case in any default decision or stipulated settlement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 58.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund [11410. - 11420.]

11410.

The Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury to consist of moneys raised by fees and assessments imposed pursuant to this part. Interest shall be paid at the pooled money investment rate on all money transferred to the General Fund from the Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16310 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 790, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 11420.)
-------------------------------------------

11411.

There shall be separate accounts in the Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund for purposes of administration and for purposes of recovery. These accounts shall be known respectively as the Administration Account and the Recovery Account. On and after January 1, 2026, 5 percent of the amount of any license or certificate fee collected in the 2024–25 fiscal year shall be transferred to the Recovery Account. On and after January 1, 2026, 5 percent of any license or
 certificate fee collected under this part
 shall be credited to the Recovery Account. The Recovery Account is a continuing appropriation for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 33.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 11420.)
-------------------------------------------

11411.5.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Application” means an application for payment from the Recovery Account filed with the bureau pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11413.

(b) “Claimant” means an aggrieved person who files an application pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11413.

(c) “Court of competent jurisdiction” means a small claims, municipal, or superior court of the State of California, or a United States district court or a United States bankruptcy court sitting to conduct its affairs within the boundaries of the State of California.

(d) “Digital signature” has the same meaning as in subdivision (d) of Section 16.5 of the Government Code. The use of an electronic signature or a digital signature shall have the same force or effect as a wet signature.

(e) “Electronic filer” means a claimant or claimant’s attorney who electronically uploads or transmits to the bureau an application or document in electronic form at or through the bureau’s internet website.

(f) “Electronic signature” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1633.2 of the Civil Code.

(g) “Electronic submission” means the upload or transmission of an application or document by electronic means at or through the bureau’s internet website.

(h) “Final judgment” means a judgment, arbitration
 award, or criminal restitution order for which the period for appeal has expired, enforcement of which is not barred by the order of any court or by any statutory provision, and which has not been nullified or rendered void by any court order or statutory provision.

(i) “Party” means either the claimant, the judgment debtor, or the bureau.

(j) “Person” includes corporation, partnership, company, or firm.

(k) “Recovery account” means the separate account in the Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund established pursuant to Section 11411.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 34.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 11420.)
-------------------------------------------

11412.

(a) On or before January 1, 2002, the director shall determine the number of complaint cases containing judicial findings of fraud that may be eligible for recovery. This information shall be used by the director to determine whether a real estate appraiser Recovery Account is necessary or whether to recommend that it should be eliminated.

(b) The statute of limitations for claims against the fund arising between the effective date of this part and the creation of the fund shall be tolled until the date the fund is created.

(c) On and after July 1, 2026, the bureau shall do both of the following:

(1) Post information on its internet website about the Recovery Account, including eligibility requirements and the application process.

(2) Upon receipt of a complaint by a licensee or a member of the public, provide a notification to the complainant that includes information regarding eligibility requirements and the application process.

(d) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually
 thereafter, the bureau shall submit to the Legislature a report in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code that includes, for the prior fiscal year, the balance of the Recovery Account, the number of applicants who applied for payment from the Recovery Account, the number of applicants whose claims were approved, and the total payments made from the Recovery Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 35.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 11420.)
-------------------------------------------

11412.2.

(a) In addition to the amount paid into the Recovery Account as set forth in Section 11411, the director may authorize a transfer from the Administration Account to the Recovery Account of any amount deemed necessary.

(b) If the balance remaining in the Recovery Account contains more than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), the director may authorize the transfer of all or part of the surplus amount to the Administration Account.

(c) The director may authorize the return to the Recovery Account of all or any amount previously transferred to the Administration Account under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 36.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 11420.)
-------------------------------------------

11413.

(a) (1) When an aggrieved person obtains either (A) a final judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, a criminal restitution order issued pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code or Section 3663 of Title 18 of the United States Code, or (B) an arbitration award that includes findings of fact and conclusions of law rendered in accordance with the rules established by the American Arbitration Association or another recognized arbitration body, and in accordance with Sections 1281 to 1294.2, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure when applicable, and when the arbitration award has been confirmed and reduced to judgment pursuant to Section 1287.4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, against a defendant based upon the defendant’s
 fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit with intent to defraud, and arising directly out of any transaction in which the defendant, while licensed under this part, performed acts for which a real estate appraiser’s license was required, the aggrieved person may, upon the judgment becoming final, file an application with the bureau for payment from the Recovery Account, within the limitations specified in Section 11418, of the amount unpaid on the judgment that represents an actual and direct loss to the claimant in the transaction.

(2) As used in this section, “actual and direct loss” excludes all of the following:

(A) Punitive or exemplary damages.

(B) Legal fees, attorney’s fees, court costs, or arbitration fees.

(C) Nonpecuniary damages, such as
 inconvenience, aggravation, and emotional distress.

(b) The application shall be delivered in person, by certified mail, or electronically in a manner prescribed by the bureau, to an office of the bureau no later than one year after the judgment has become final.

(c) The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the bureau, verified by the claimant, and shall include the following:

(1) The name and address of the claimant.

(2) If the claimant is represented by an attorney, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney.

(3) The identification of the judgment, the amount of the claim and an explanation of its computation.

(4) A detailed narrative statement of the facts in explanation of the allegations of the complaint upon which the underlying judgment is based.

(5) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a statement by the claimant, signed under penalty of perjury, that the complaint upon which the underlying judgment is based was prosecuted conscientiously and in good faith. As used in this section, “conscientiously and in good faith” means that no party potentially liable to the claimant in the underlying transaction was intentionally and without good cause omitted from the complaint, that no party named in the complaint who otherwise reasonably appeared capable of responding in damages was dismissed from the complaint intentionally and without good cause, and that the claimant employed no other procedural means contrary to the diligent prosecution of the complaint in order
 to seek to qualify for the Recovery Account.

(B) For the purpose of an application based on a criminal restitution order, all of the following statements by the claimant:

(i) The claimant has not intentionally and without good cause failed to pursue any person potentially liable to the claimant in the underlying transaction other than a defendant who is the subject of a criminal restitution order.

(ii) The claimant has not intentionally and without good cause failed to pursue in a civil action for damages all persons potentially liable to the claimant in the underlying transaction who otherwise reasonably appeared capable of responding in damages other than a defendant who is the subject of a criminal restitution order.

(iii) The claimant employed no
 other procedural means contrary to the diligent prosecution of the complaint in order to seek to qualify for the Recovery Account.

(6) The name and address of the judgment debtor or, if not known, the names and addresses of persons who may know the judgment debtor’s present whereabouts.

(7) The following representations and information from the claimant:

(A) That the claimant is not a spouse of the judgment debtor nor a personal representative of the spouse.

(B) That the claimant has complied with all of the requirements of this chapter.

(C) That the judgment underlying the claim meets the requirements of subdivision (a).

(D) A description of searches and inquiries conducted by or on behalf of the claimant with respect to the judgment debtor’s assets liable to be sold or applied to satisfaction of the judgment, an itemized valuation of the assets discovered, and the results of actions by the claimant to have the assets applied to satisfaction of the judgment.

(E) That the claimant has diligently pursued collection efforts against all judgment debtors and all other persons liable to the claimant in the transaction that is the basis for the underlying judgment.

(F) That the underlying judgment and debt have not been discharged in bankruptcy, or, in the case of a bankruptcy proceeding that is open at or after the time of the filing of the application, that the judgment and debt have been declared to be nondischargeable.

(G) That the application was submitted to the bureau, as prescribed in subdivision (b), no later than one year after the underlying judgment became final.

(d) The application form shall include detailed instructions with respect to documentary evidence, pleadings, court rulings, the products of discovery in the underlying litigation, and a notice to the applicant of their obligation to protect the underlying judgment from discharge in bankruptcy, to be appended to the application.

(e) An application for payment from the Recovery Account that is based on a criminal restitution order shall comply with all of the requirements of this chapter. For the purpose of an application based on a criminal restitution order, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Complaint” means the facts of the
 underlying transaction upon which the criminal restitution order is based.

(2) “Judgment” means the criminal restitution order.

(3) “Judgment debtor” means any defendant who is the subject of the criminal restitution order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 37.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 11420.)
-------------------------------------------

11413.1.

(a) The claimant shall serve a copy of the notice prescribed in subdivision (e) together with a copy of the application upon the judgment debtor by personal service, by certified mail, or by publication, as set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) If the judgment debtor holds an unexpired and unrevoked license issued by the bureau, service of the notice and a copy of the application may be made by certified mail addressed to the judgment debtor at the latest business or residence address on file with the bureau. If the judgment debtor does not hold an unexpired and unrevoked license issued by the bureau and personal service cannot be effected through the exercise of reasonable diligence, the claimant shall serve the judgment debtor by one
 publication of the notice in each of two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the judgment debtor was last known to reside.

(c) If the application is served upon the judgment debtor by certified mail, service is complete five days after mailing if the place of address is within the State of California, 10 days after mailing if the place of address is outside the State of California but within the United States, and 20 days after mailing if the place of address is outside the United States. Personal service is complete on the date of service. Service by publication is complete upon completion of the second week of publication.

(d) If a judgment debtor wishes to contest payment of an application by the bureau, the debtor shall mail or deliver a written response to the application addressed to the bureau at its headquarters office
 within 30 days after service of the notice and application, and shall mail or deliver a copy of the response to the claimant. If a judgment debtor fails to mail or deliver a timely response, the debtor shall have waived their right to present objections to payment.
